Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1548
Execution to another county; return by mail; effect upon liability of officer.

When execution shall be issued in any county in this state, and directed to the sheriff or coroner of another county, it shall be lawful for such sheriff or coroner having the execution, after having discharged all the duties required of him by law, to enclose such execution by mail to the clerk of the court who issued the same. On proof being made by such sheriff or coroner that the execution was mailed soon enough to have reached the office where it was issued within the time prescribed by law, the sheriff or coroner shall not be liable for any amercement or penalty if it does not reach the office in due time.

R.S.1867, Code § 516, p. 483;

R.S.1913, § 8095;

C.S.1922, § 9031;

C.S.1929, § 20-1549;

R.S.1943, § 25-1548.